Tennessee, session 114, HB1806.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title , Chapter , Part , is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
The department shall apply for federal grants and other federal funds available to
this state through the summer electronic benefits transfer (EBT) for children program
established under 42 U.S.C. § 1762 for the purpose of providing nutrition assistance
through the EBT during the summer months for each eligible child to ensure continued
access to food when school is not in session. The department shall submit the
application for the program no later than January 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1806
011566
- 1 -